Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 10. Derivative Actions

§ 3491.
Right of action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3492.
Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and must have been a partner at the time of the transaction of which he or she complains or his or her status as a partner must have devolved upon him or her by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3493.
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3494.
Expenses.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and shall direct him or her to remit to the limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him or her.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.